Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6116
Stock purchase rights.

Nothing in the Insurers Demutualization Act shall prohibit the inclusion in the plan of conversion of provisions under which individuals comprising the new stock insurer's board of directors, officers, employees, agents, and persons acting as trustees of employee stock ownership plans or other employee benefit plans may be entitled to purchase for cash capital stock of the new stock insurer at the same price initially issued by the new stock insurer under the plan of conversion but no such purchase may be made while any shares of capital stock are held in a trust established pursuant to the plan of conversion.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 56;

Laws 1999, LB 326, § 9.